Mississippi statutes. Title 95. Torts
Chapter 7. Liability Exemption for Donors of Food

§ 95-7-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Apparently wholesome food” shall mean food that is prepared or perishable or raw agricultural products which appear to be fit for human consumption at the time it is donated. Such food does not include canned goods that are leaking, swollen, dented on a seam, or no longer airtight.

“Charitable or nonprofit organization” shall mean an incorporated or unincorporated organization that has been established and is operating for religious, charitable, or educational purposes and that does not distribute any of its income to its members, directors or officers.

“Intentional misconduct” shall mean conduct that the person acting knows is harmful to the health or well-being of another person.

“Donate” shall mean to give without requiring anything of monetary value from the donee.

“Person” shall mean an individual, corporation, partnership, organization or association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 534, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 95-7-3.
Donors of apparently wholesome food to charitable or nonprofit institutions not to be liable; exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any person who makes a good faith donation to a charitable or nonprofit organization of apparently wholesome food, shall not be liable for damages in any civil action for any injury or death because of the condition of such food unless the injury or death is a direct result of the gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct of the donor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 534, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 95-7-5.
Charitable or nonprofit organizations not liable as result of distribution of donated food.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a charitable or nonprofit organization which in good faith receives and distributes, without charge, food which the organization reasonably determines to be apparently wholesome shall not be liable for damages in any civil action based on the doctrine of strict liability in tort for any injury or death because of the condition of such food.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 534, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 95-7-7.
Application of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to all good faith donations of perishable food or raw agricultural products which are not readily marketable because of appearance, freshness, grade, surplus supply or other conditions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 534, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 95-7-9.
Labeling of food.

Any charitable or nonprofit organization distributing food pursuant to this chapter shall affix a label upon such food or upon the individual container or package of such food, or in the dining hall where such prepared foods are served, stating that the food is not for resale and stating that pursuant to state law this organization shall not be liable in any civil action based on strict liability in tort for any injury or death because of the condition of such food.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 534, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 95-7-11.
Sale of donated food prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person or charitable or nonprofit organization receiving food pursuant to this chapter to sell or offer to sell such donated food. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall upon conviction be guilty of a misdemeanor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 534, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 95-7-13.
Regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 534, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1983.